Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.130

Fire protection—Duties of chief of the Washington state patrol.

Standards for fire protection and the enforcement thereof, with respect to all assisted living facilities to be licensed hereunder, shall be the responsibility of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, who shall adopt such recognized standards as may be applicable to assisted living facilities for the protection of life against the cause and spread of fire and fire hazards. The department, upon receipt of an application for a license, shall submit to the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, in writing, a request for an inspection, giving the applicant's name and the location of the premises to be licensed. Upon receipt of such a request, the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, or his or her deputy, shall make an inspection of the assisted living facility to be licensed, and if it is found that the premises do not comply with the required safety standards and fire rules as adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, he or she shall promptly make a written report to the assisted living facility and the department as to the manner and time allowed in which the premises must qualify for a license and set forth the conditions to be remedied with respect to fire rules. The department, applicant, or licensee shall notify the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, upon completion of any requirements made by him or her, and the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, or his or her deputy, shall make a reinspection of such premises. Whenever the assisted living facility to be licensed meets with the approval of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, he or she shall submit to the department a written report approving same with respect to fire protection before a full license can be issued. The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, shall make or cause to be made inspections of such facilities at least annually.

In cities which have in force a comprehensive building code, the provisions of which are determined by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, to be equal to the minimum standards of the code for assisted living facilities adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, the chief of the fire department, provided the latter is a paid chief of a paid fire department, shall make the inspection with the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, or his or her deputy, and they shall jointly approve the premises before a full license can be issued.

[ 2012 c 10 s 8; 2000 c 47 s 6; 1995 c 369 s 4; 1986 c 266 s 81; 1957 c 253 s 13.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Effective date—2000 c 47: See note following RCW 18.20.020.

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

State fire protection: Chapter 43.44 RCW.